Utah statutes.
17-23-13.   Setting monuments.
(1) (a)  When establishing a section, quarter-section, or center corners, the
county surveyor or his designee shall set a monument of durable quality.
(b)  Wherever the nature of the ground will not allow the setting of a
monument at the exact corner as described, then a witness monument shall be
set.
(2) (a)  Whenever possible, section corners and quarter-section corners shall
be witnessed by at least four references of durable quality.
(b)  All references shall be carefully described, and their bearings and
distances noted in the report.
